Hawaii statutes.
§111-8 Authority of Hawaii housing finance
and development corporation. (a) The Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation shall make such regulations as may be necessary to
assure: (1) that relocation payments authorized by section 111-3 are fair and
reasonable; (2) that a displaced person that makes proper application for a
relocation payment authorized by this chapter is, if personal property is
disposed of and replaced for use at the new location, paid an amount equal to
the reasonable expenses that would have been required in removing such personal
property to the new location; (3) that a displaced person making proper
application for and entitled to receive a relocation payment authorized by this
chapter is paid promptly after the relocation; (4) that a displaced person has
a reasonable time from the date of displacement in which to apply for a
relocation payment authorized by this chapter.

(b) In order to prevent unnecessary expense
and duplication of functions and to promote uniform and effective
administration of relocation assistance programs for displaced persons, the
Hawaii housing finance and development corporation may require that any other
state or county agency may make relocation payments or provide relocation
services or otherwise carry out its functions under this chapter by utilizing
the facilities, personnel, and services of an already existing agency
designated by the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation or shall
establish an organization for conducting relocation assistance programs or of
any other agency conducting comparable programs. The Hawaii housing finance
and development corporation, or other agency providing such services may charge
a reasonable fee to any other agency utilizing its relocation assistance
services. [L 1970, c 166, §8; am L 1987, c 337, §16; am L 1997, c 350, §14; am
L 2005, c 196, §26(b); am L 2006, c 180, §16]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next